en: white and yellow beeswax
bg: пчелен восък - бял и жълт
ca: cera d'abelles blnaca i groga
cs: včelí vosk bílý a žlutý
da: bivoks hvidt og gult
de: Bienenwachs Weiß und Gelb
el: κηρός μελισσών λευκός και κίτρινος
es: cera de abejas blanca y amarilla
et: toonitamata ja toonitatud meevaha
fi: mehiläisvaha valkoinen ja keltainen
fr: cire d'abeille blanche et jaune
hr: bijeli i žuti pčelinji vosak, pčelinji vosak bijeli i žuti
hu: fehér és sárga méhviasz
it: cera d'api bianca e gialla
lv: bišu vasks baltais un dzeltenais
mt: xama’ tan-naħal bajda u safra
nb: bivoks hvit og gull
nl: bijenwas - wit en geel, wit en geel
pl: wosk pszczeli biały i żółty
pt: cera de abelhas branca ou amarela
ro: ceară de albine albă și galbenă
sk: biely a žltý včelí vosk
sl: čebelji vosek beli in rumeni
sv: bivax vitt och gult

en: Sodium cyclamate
bg: Натриев цикламат
ca: ciclamat de sodi
de: Natriumcyclamat
el: Κυκλαμικό νάτριο
es: Ciclamato de sodio
fa: سیکلامات سدیم
fi: natriumsyklamaatti
fr: cyclamate de sodium
hr: natrijev ciklamat
hu: nátrium-ciklamát
hy: Նատրիումի ցիկլամատ
id: Natrium siklamat
it: sodio ciclamato, sodio ciclammato
kk: Натрий цикламаты
ko: 시클라메이트
nl: Natriumcyclamaat
pl: cyklaminian sodu
pt: Cyclamate de sodium
ro: Ciclamat de sodiu
ru: цикламат натрия
sh: Natrijum ciklamat
sr: Natrijum ciklamat
sv: Natriumcyklamat
th: โซเดียมไซคลาเมต
vi: Natri cyclamat

en: lysozyme from eggs, egg lysozyme, egg white lysozyme
bg: яйчен лизозим
ca: lisozim d'ou
cs: lysozym z vajec
da: lysozym fra æg
de: Lysozym aus Ei
el: λυσοζύμη από το ΑΥΓΟ
es: lisozima de huevo
fi: lysotsyymi kananmunasta
fr: lysozyme d'œuf, lysozyme d'oeuf, lysozyme issu de protéine d'oeufs
hr: jajčani lizozim, lizozim iz jaja, lisozim iz jaja
it: lisozima da uovo, lisozima d'uovo
nl: lysozym uit ei, lysozym van ei
pl: lizozym z jaj, lizozym z białka jaja kurzego, lizozym jajeczny
ru: белок яичный сухой, белок яичный, яичный белок
sl: lizocim iz JAJC
sv: lysozym från ägg, lysozym av ägg

en: tapioca dextrin
de: Tapiokadextrine
fi: tapiokadekstriini
fr: dextrine de tapioca, dextrine de manioc
hr: tapioka dekstrin
it: destrina di tapioca
pl: dekstryny z tapioki, dekstryna z tapioki

en: potato dextrin
bg: картофен декстрин
de: Kartoffeldextrin, Kartoffel-Dextrin
es: dextrina de patata
fi: perunadekstriini
fr: dextrine de pomme de terre
hr: krumpirov dekstrin
it: destrina di patate
nl: aardappeldextrine

bg: пшеничен декстрин
es: dextrina de trigo
fi: vehnädekstriini
fr: dextrine de blé
it: destrina di grano
nl: tarwedextrine

en: corn dextrin
bg: царевичен декстрин
de: Maisdextrin
es: dextrina de maiz
fi: maissidekstriini
fr: dextrine de maïs
hr: kukuruzni dekstrin
hu: kukoricadextrin, dextrin kukoricából
it: Destrina di mais
nl: maïsdextrine

en: modified potato starch
bg: модифицирано картофено нишесте
ca: midó modificat de patata
cs: modifikovaný bramborový škrob
da: modificeret kartoffelstivelse
de: modifizierte Kartoffelstärke
es: almidón modificado de patata, almidon de patata modificado
fi: muunnettu perunatärkkelys, modifioitu perunatärkkelys
fr: amidon modifié de pomme de terre, amidon modifié de pommes de terre, amidon de pomme de terre modifié, amidon transformé de pommes de terre, amidon de pommes de terre modifié, amidon transformé de pomme de terre, fécule de pomme de terre modifiée, fécule modifiée de pommes de terre
hr: modificirani krumpirov škrob
hu: módosított burgonyakeményítő
it: amido di patate modificiate, amido modificato di patata
ja: 加工澱粉, じゃがいもでん粉
lt: modifikuotas bulvių krakmolas
nb: modifisert potetstivelse
nl: gemodificeerd aardappelzetmeel
pl: skrobia modyfikowana ziemniaczana, skrobia ziemniaczana modyfikowana, modyfikowana skrobia ziemniaczana
pt: amido modificado de batata, amido de batata modificado
ro: amidon modificat din cartofi
ru: модифицированный картофельный крахмал
sl: modificiran krompirjev škrob
sv: modifierad potatisstärkelse

en: ferment
az: fermentlər
ba: Ферменттар
be: Ферменты
bg: закваска, закваски, българска закваска, млечнокисели култури, симбиотична закваска, стартерни млечнокисели култури, стартерна култура, стартерни култури, млечно кисели култури, млечно-киселинна култура, млечнокисела закваска
ca: ferment, ferments
cs: Kvasnice
da: gæret
de: fermentiert
es: fermentos
fi: hapate, hapatteet, käyte, käyteaine
fr: ferment, ferments, cultures
hr: ferment
hu: fermentált, erjesztett, kovászolt
it: fermenti
kk: Ферменттер
ky: Фермент
lt: fermentas
lv: ferments, fermenti
nb: fermentere, gjære
nl: Ferment, rijpingscultuur
pl: Fermentacja
pt: fermento, fermentos
ru: Фермент, закваска, заквасочные культуры, йогуртовая закваска, с использованием закваски
sv: jäsa, syrningsmedel
tt: Фермент
uk: Ферменти
uz: fermentlar

en: coagulating enzyme
bg: коагулиращ ензим, коагулиращи ензими
cs: Koagulační enzym
de: gerinnendes Enzym
es: Enzima coagulante
fi: hyydytysentsyymi
fr: enzyme coagulante, enzymes coagulantes, coagulant enzymatique
hr: koagulacijski enzim
hu: koaguláló enzim
it: enzima coagulante
lv: koagulācijas enzīms
nl: stollingsmiddel, stremmingsenzymen
pl: Enzym koagulujący
pt: coagulante
ru: молокосвертывающий фермент
sv: koagulerande enzym, mjölkkoagulerande enzym, mjölkkoagulerande ystenzym

en: microbial coagulating enzyme, microbial enzyme, microbial
bg: микробиологичен ензим, сирище с микробиален произход, сирищни ензими с микробиален произход
ca: coagulant de llet microbià, coagulant microbià
de: mikrobieller Labaustauschstoff
es: coagulante de leche microbiano, Encima coagulate microbiana, coagulante microbiano
fr: enzyme coagulante microbienne, enzyme coagulante d'origine microbienne, coagulant microbien, enzyme microbienne
hr: mikrobni koagulacijski enzim
it: enzima microbico, enzima coagulante microbiotico
nl: microbiële stremmingsenzymen
ru: ферментный препарат микробного происхождения

en: microbial culture, culture, active cultures, live cultures, starter culture, bacteria culture, bacterial culture, live bacteria culture, live bacterial culture, bacterial cultures, bacteria cultures
bg: микробна култура, живи култури
ca: Cultiu microbiològic
cs: Mikrobiální kultura, startovací kultura
da: aktive kulturer, levende kulturer
de: mikrobielle Kultur, Kulturen
es: Cultivo microbiano
fi: mikrobiviljelmä, viljelmä
fr: culture bactérienne, ferments naturels
he: תרבית מיקרוביאלית
hr: mikrobne kulture
hu: baktérium kultúra, baktériumkultúra, kultúra, kultúrák, elő kultúrák
it: coltura microbiotica, coltura
lv: mikrobu kultūra
nl: microbiële cultuur
pl: Kultury bakterii, żywe kultury bakterii, kultury starterowe, kultury startowe bakterii, kultury starterowe bakterii, bakterie
pt: Cultura microbial
ro: Culturi microbiene
sv: mikrobiell kultur, kultur, aktiva kulturer, levande kulturer, bakteriekultur

en: lactic ferments, lactic starters, lactic cultures, live yoghurt bacteria cultures, live yoghurt cultures, culture of acid-lactic bacteria, lactic acid bacteria, lactic acid culture, yogurt lactic ferment, cheese culture, cheese cultures, yogurt ferments
bg: Млечни ферментации, млечна закваска, млечни закваски, млечни култури, закваски за кисело мляко, закваска за кисело мляко, млечни ферменти
ca: Ferments làctics
cs: bakterie mléčného kvašení, mléčné ferminty
da: yoghurtkultur, starterkultur, mælkesyrekultur, mælkesyrekulturer, ostekulturer
de: Milchfermenten, Milchsäurekulturen, Milchsäurebakterienkultur, Milchsäurebakterien, Käsekultur, Milchsäurebakterienkulturen, Joghurtkulturen, lebende Joghurtkulturen, Säuerungskulturen, milchsauer vergoren, Milchsäuerungskulturen, Milchsäurekultur, Käsereikulturen, Starterkulturen, Biogarde-Markenkulturen, Milchfermente
el: γαλακτικά ένζυμα
es: fermentos lácticos, fermentos lácteos, cultivos lácticos, ferments del yogur, cultivos de bacterias lácticas especificas, cultivos lácticos específicos
et: juuretis
fi: maitohappokäyte, maitohappokannat, maitohappoviljelmä, elävä jogurttiviljelmä, elävä jogurttibakteeriviljelmä, elävät jogurttibakteeriviljelmät, maitohappobakteeriviljelmä, maitohappobakteeriviljelmät, maitohappobakteerit, maitohappobakteerikanta, maitohappobakteerikannat, juustoviljelmä, juustoviljelmät, hapankulttuuri, jogurttihapate, maitohappobakteeri, käynnistin kulttuuri
fr: ferment lactique, ferments lactique, ferments lactiques, ferment lactiques, culture de bactéries lactiques, cultures lactiques, ferment lactique du yaourt, ferments lactiques du yaourt, ferments vivants du yaourt, bactéries lactiques, ferments lactiques naturels, levain lactique
hr: mljekarska kultura, mljekarske kulture, mlijekarske kulture, sirna kultura, sirne kulture, starter kultura, baktrije mliječnog vrenja, bakterije mliječne kiseline, kultura plemenitih plijesni, sirište mljekarske kulture, mezofilna starter kultura, starter kulture, mliječnokiselinske kulture, kultura mliječnih bakterija, mliječno-kiselinske bakterije, mliječno-kiselinske kulture
hu: tejsavbaktériumok, tejsavbaktérium, starterkultúra, starter kultúra, tejsavbaktérium-tenyészet, tejsavbaktérium kultúra, joghurtkultúra, joghurtkultúrák, sajtkultúra, sajtkultúrák, tejoltó enzim
it: fermenti lattici, coltura di batteri acidolattici, fermenti lattici vivi, fermenti latici vivi, fermenti lattici dello yogurt
lt: jogurtinės bakterijos
lv: pienskābes fermenti, pienskābes baktēriju ieraugs, Pienskābo baktēriju ieraugs
nb: melkesyrekultur, starterkultur, yoghurtkultur, yoghurtbakterier, syrekultur
nl: melkfermenten, melkkiemen, Melkzuurbacteriën, zuursel, yoghurtcultuur, yoghurtculturen
pl: żywe kultury bakterii jogurtowych, bakterie fermentacji mlekowej, kultury bakterii mlekowych, kultury bakterii kwasu mlekowego, kultury bakterii jogurtowych, bakterie fermentacji kwasu mlekowego, bakterie kwasu mlekowego, żywe kultury bakterii mlekowych, kultury bakterii fermentacji mlekowej, kultury mleczarskie, żywe bakterie jogurtowe
pt: fermentos lácteos, culturas lácteas, leveduras lacteas, fermentos láticos, fermentos lácticos
ro: culturi lactice, culturi lactice selecționate, culturi lactice selectionate, fermenți de iaurt, fermenti de iaurt, fermenți lactici, fermenti lactici
ru: Молочные ферменты, пробиотические микроорганизм
sv: syrningskultur, syrakultur, syrakulturer, mjölksyrakultur, yoghurtkultur, startkultur, filkultur, filmjölkskultur, starterkultur, levande mjölksyrakultur, mjölksyrakulturer

en: probiotic cultures
de: probiotische Kulturen
es: cultivos probióticos
hr: probiotičke kulture
hu: probiotikus kultúrák, probiotikus kultúra, probiotikum kultúrák, probiotikum kultúra
it: coltura probiotica

en: kombucha culture, kombuncha cultures, symbiotic culture
da: kombuchakultur
es: cultivo de kombucha
fr: culture de kombucha
hr: kombucha kultura
it: coltura di kombucha
la: Medusomyces gisevii, Medusomyces gisevi
sv: kombuchakultur

en: tempeh culture
de: Tempeh-Kultur
it: coltura di tempeh

en: yogurt culture
cs: jogurtové kultury
es: fermentos del yogur
fr: cultures de yaourt
hr: jogurtna kultura, jogurtne kulture, jogurtna baza
it: fermenti dello yogurt, coltura di yogurt

en: skyr cultures
da: skyr kultur
de: Skyr-Kulturen
fi: skyrhapatteet
fr: cultures de skyr
hr: skyr kulture
is: skyrgerlar
it: coltura di skyr
nl: skyr-culturen

en: sourdough starter, sourdough culture
da: surdejskultur
de: Sauerteig-Starter, Sauerteigstarter, Sauerteigstarterkulturen, Sauerteigkulturen
es: levadura natural de masa madre, levadura de masa madre
fr: Starters pour levain
hr: predjelo od kiselog tijesta
it: lievito madre

en: vegan lactic ferments
da: vegansk yoghurtkultur
de: vegane Joghurtkulturen
es: Fermentos lácticos veganos
fr: cultures lactiques véganes
hr: veganski mliječni fermenti
it: fermenti lattici vegani, fermenti lattici vivi vegani
nb: vegansk yoghurtkultur
sv: vegansk yoghurtkultur